Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9079. FORT HANCOCK WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT OF HUDSPETH COUNTY, TEXAS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9079.0001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Fort Hancock Water Control and Improvement District of Hudspeth County, Texas.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9079.0002. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC USE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9079.0003. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district is composed of the territory described by Section 5, Chapter 78, Acts of the 57th Legislature, Regular Session, 1961, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter O, Chapter 51, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 9079.0051. NOTICE OF DIRECTORS' ELECTION. Notice of a directors' election shall be posted in three or more public places in the district for at least 14 days before the date of the election.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9079.0052. DIRECTOR'S BOND. Each director shall give bond in the amount of $1,000 for the faithful performance of the director's duties.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 9079.0101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, and duties provided by general law applicable to a water control and improvement district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9079.0102. COST OF RELOCATING OR ALTERING PROPERTY. If the district's exercise of a power granted under this chapter makes necessary relocating, raising, rerouting, changing the grade of, or altering the construction of a highway, railroad, electric transmission line, telephone or telegraph property or facility, or pipeline, the necessary action shall be accomplished at the sole expense of the district.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9079.0151. TAX METHOD. (a) The district shall use the ad valorem plan of taxation, and taxes levied by the district must be on the ad valorem basis.

(b) A hearing on a plan of taxation is not required.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER E. BONDS

Sec. 9079.0201. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS. (a) The district may issue bonds if authorized by a majority of district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

(b) The district may issue bonds for any purpose permitted to a water control and improvement district.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9079.0202. NOTICE OF BOND ELECTION. Notice of a bond election must be posted at three public places in the district for at least 14 days before the date of the election.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.